Massachusetts, session 194th, S1145.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 15D of Chapter 265, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by striking out the words in lines 7 through 9 and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- 
“Strangulation”, means intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly impeding the normal 
breathing or circulation of the blood of a person by applying pressure to the throat or neck, 
regardless of whether that conduct results in any visible injury or whether there is any intent to 
kill or protractedly injure the victim.